Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1640.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6152.2. Protection of reproductive health services records. (a) Disclosures.--Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter and except as provided under subsections (c) and (d), in a civil action or proceeding, including a preliminary hearing, or in an investigation or a proceeding by a district attorney or an agency, a covered entity may not disclose any of the following unless a patient or the patient's guardian or other authorized legal representative explicitly consents in writing to the disclosure:(1) A communication made to the covered entity from the 123456789101112131415161718 patient or the patient's guardian or other authorized legal representative relating to reproductive health care services that are permitted under the laws of this Commonwealth.(2) Information obtained by personal examination of the patient relating to reproductive health care services that are permitted under the laws of this Commonwealth.(b) Duties of covered entities.--A covered entity shall inform a patient or the patient's guardian or other authorized legal representative of the patient's right to withhold written consent to a disclosure specified under subsection (a).(c) Exceptions.--The written consent of a patient or patient's guardian or other authorized legal representative shall not be required for a disclosure under subsection (a) if any of the following apply:(1) The disclosure is authorized by the rules of court under section 1722 (relating to adoption of administrative and procedural rules).(2) The disclosure is made by a covered entity to the covered entity's attorney or professional liability insurer or the insurer's agent for use in the defense of a claim made against the covered entity or when there is a reasonable belief that a claim will be made against the covered entity in a civil action or proceeding.(3) The disclosure is made to the Department of State in connection with an investigation of a complaint if the disclosure is related to the complaint.(4) The disclosure is made because child abuse, abuse of a senior citizen or abuse of an individual with physical or intellectual disabilities is known or is suspected in good faith.20250HB1640PN1990 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Construction.-- (1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impede the lawful sharing of medical records as permitted by Federal or State law or the rules of court under section 1722, except in the case of a subpoena commanding the production, copying or inspection of medical records relating to reproductive health care services.(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to supplant existing State law or regulations governing the disclosure requirements for confidential communications, records or information regarding any of the following:(i) The provisions of section 5929 (relating to physicians not to disclose information).(ii) The provisions of section 5944 (relating to confidential communications to psychiatrists or licensed psychologists), 5945 (relating to confidential communications to school personnel) or 5945.1 (relating to confidential communications with sexual assault counselors) . (iii) An individual subject to the act of July 9, 1987 (P.L.220, No.39), known as the Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors Act.(iv) An individual and a domestic violence counselor/advocate as defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6102 (relating to definitions).(v) A physician licensed to practice medicine under the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985, a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine under the act of October 5, 20250HB1640PN1990 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act, or any other licensed health care practitioner or health care provider in a civil action or proceeding, including a preliminary hearing, or in an investigation or a proceeding by a district attorney or an agency.(vi) The provisions of section 111 of the act of July 9, 1976 (P.L.817, No.143), known as the Mental Health Procedures Act, or section 8 of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.221, No.63), known as the Pennsylvania Drug and Alcohol Abuse Control Act.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agency." As defined in section 102 of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law . "Covered entity." As defined in 45 CFR 160.103 (relating to definitions)."Reproductive health care services." Medical, surgical, counseling or referral services relating to the human reproductive system, including services relating to pregnancy, contraception or the termination of pregnancy.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1640PN1990 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223